Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-431
Transportation of juveniles; policies and procedures; applicable to private contractor.

Policies and procedures of the Department of Health and Human Services regarding the transportation of juveniles placed at the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers shall apply to any private contractor utilized by the Office of Juvenile Services to transport juveniles placed at the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers.

Laws 2020, LB1140, § 10.